District of Columbia statutes.
8-103.02

Discharge of pollutants prohibited; exception.

Except as provided in § 8-103.06, no person shall discharge a pollutant to the waters of the District.

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-188, § 3, 32 DCR 919
1981 Ed., § 6-922.